Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 6 Campaign Practices
7-6-220. Reporting of independent expenditures.

(a)

A person who or an independent expenditure committee which makes independent expenditures in an aggregate amount or value in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) in a calendar year shall file reports with the Secretary of State:

(1)

No later than thirty (30) days prior to preferential primary elections, general elections, and special elections covering the period ending thirty-five (35) days prior to such elections;

(2)

No later than seven (7) days prior to preferential primary elections, runoff elections, general elections, and special elections covering the period ending ten (10) days prior to such elections; and

(3)

As for a final report, no later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the last election is held at which the candidate seeks nomination or election.

(b)

Such reports shall include:

(1)

In the case of an individual making such an expenditure, the name, address, telephone number, principal place of business, employer, and occupation of the individual;

(2)

In the case of a committee, the name, address, employer, and occupation of its officers;

(3)

In the case of a person who is not an individual, the principal name of the entity, the address, and the name, address, employer, and occupation of its officers; and

(4)

The same information required of candidates for office other than school district, township, municipal, or county office as set forth in §7-6-207(b)(1).

(c)

The information required in §7-6-207(b)(1) may be provided in the form of a schedule or schedules attached to the report.

(d)

The report shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the committee stating that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the committee's contributions received and made.

(e)(1)

A report is timely filed if it is filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State on or before the date that the report is due.

(2)(A)

The Secretary of State shall receive reports in a readable electronic format that is acceptable to the Secretary of State and approved by the Arkansas Ethics Commission.

(B)

The commission shall approve the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of independent expenditure reports in electronic form to ensure that all required information is requested.

(C)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of independent expenditure report information filed in electronic form.

(3)

A person or independent expenditure committee under this section may file reports in paper form under this section if:

(A)

The person or independent expenditure committee does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports in electronic form;

(B)

Submitting reports in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the person or independent expenditure committee; and

(C)

The person or independent expenditure committee submits a notarized affidavit that complies with §7-6-231.

History.

Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 8; Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 14; 2005, No. 1284, § 6; 2011, No. 721, § 11; 2017, No. 616, § 4; 2019, No. 1039, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “7-6-207(b)(1)” for “7-6-207(b)(1)(A)-(I)” in (b)(4); and added (c) through (e).

The 2017 amendment, in (e)(1), substituted “filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State on or before” for “either delivered by hand or mailed to the Secretary of State, properly addressed, postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on”; deleted former (e)(2); redesignated former (e)(3) as present (e)(2)(A) and substituted “shall receive” for “may receive” in present (e)(2)(A); added (e)(2)(B) and (e)(2)(C); and added (e)(3).

The 2019 amendment inserted “committee” in (e)(3)(B); and added (e)(3)(C).

7-6-221. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the independent expenditure disclosure, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 15. The section was derived from Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 9.

7-6-222. Tax credits for certain individual political contributions.

(a)

Pursuant to rules to be adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration, a credit against individual Arkansas income taxes shall be allowed for money contributions made by the taxpayer in a taxable year to one (1) or more of the following:

(1)

A candidate seeking nomination or election to a public office at an election or to the candidate's campaign committee;

(2)

An approved political action committee as defined in §7-6-201; or

(3)

An organized political party as defined in §7-1-101.

(b)

The credit allowed by subsection (a) of this section shall be the aggregate contributions, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00), on an individual tax return, or the aggregate contributions, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100), on a joint return.

(c)

Credits for contributions qualifying under this section and made prior to April 15 in a calendar year may be applied to the return filed for the previous taxable year.

History.

Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 10; Acts 1999, No. 1446, § 1; 2003, No. 774, § 1; 2005, No. 1284, § 7; 2007, No. 221, § 11; 2019, No. 315, § 421.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted former (a)(2) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (a).

7-6-223. Reports of contributions by political parties.

(a)

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after the end of each calendar quarter, each political party that meets the definition of political party stated in §7-1-101 or that has met the petition requirements of §7-7-205 shall file a quarterly report with the Secretary of State.

(b)

The report shall include:

(1)

The total amount of contributions received by the political party during the preceding calendar quarter;

(2)

An itemization, including the name, address, employer, and occupation of each person who made a contribution or contributions to the political party which, in the aggregate, exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00) in the preceding calendar quarter, as well as the amount received and date of receipt;

(3)

The total amount of money disbursed by the political party during the preceding calendar quarter; and

(4)

An itemization, including the amount of the disbursement, the name and address of the person to whom the disbursement was made, and the date the disbursement was made for each single disbursement that exceeded one hundred dollars ($100).

(c)

If a political party received contributions and disbursed money before the calendar quarter in which it met the petition requirements of §7-7-205, the first quarterly report shall also include all information required by subsection (b) of this section which occurred before the quarter in which the political party met the petition requirements of §7-7-205.

History.

Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 11; Acts 2003, No. 1730, § 1; 2005, No. 1284, § 8; 2009, No. 473, § 7;
2013, No. 382, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2013 amendment added (c).

7-6-224. Authority of local jurisdictions.

(a)

Municipalities, counties, and townships may establish reasonable limitations on:

(1)

Time periods that candidates for local office shall be allowed to solicit contributions;

(2)

Limits on contributions to local candidates at amounts lower than those set by state law; and

(3)

Voluntary campaign expenditure limits for candidates seeking election to their respective governing bodies.

(b)

Enforcement of any limitation established under subsection (a) of this section is the responsibility of the municipality, county, or township establishing the limitation.

History.

Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 12; Acts 2019, No. 240, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added the (a) designation; substituted “may” for “shall have the authority to” in the introductory language of (a); and added (b).

7-6-225. Filing deadlines.

Whenever a report becomes due on a day which is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the report shall be due the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 553, § 23; 2001, No. 1839, § 16.

7-6-226. Registration and reporting by county political party committees.

(a)(1)(A)

To qualify as a county political party committee, the committee shall register with the Secretary of State within fifteen (15) days after accepting contributions during a calendar year that exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the aggregate.

(B)

The registration shall be renewed annually by January 15, unless the committee has ceased to exist.

(C)

Registration shall be on forms provided by the Secretary of State, and the contents of the form shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the committee.

(2)(A)

The committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing the name, address, and place of employment of each person that contributed to the committee, along with the amount contributed.

(B)

Furthermore, the committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing the name and address of each candidate who received a contribution from the committee, along with the amount contributed.

(3)(A)

The committee shall appoint a treasurer who is a qualified elector of the State of Arkansas.

(B)

No contribution shall be accepted from a committee and no expenditure shall be made by a committee that has not registered and which does not have a treasurer.

(4)

No county political party committee shall accept a contribution from a prohibited political action committee as defined in §7-6-201.

(b)

The county political party committee shall disclose on the registration form the following information:

(1)

The name, address, and, when available, phone number of the committee and the name, address, phone number, and place of employment of each of its officers. If the committee's name is an acronym, then both the acronym and the words forming the acronym shall be disclosed;

(2)

The political party with which the county political party committee is affiliated;

(3)

The full name and street address, city, state, and zip code of the financial institution in this state that the committee designates as its official depository for the purposes of depositing all money contributions that it receives in this state and making all expenditures in this state; and

(4)

A written acceptance of appointment by the treasurer.

(c)(1)

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after the end of each calendar quarter, county political party committees shall file a quarterly report with the Secretary of State, including the following information:

(A)

The total amount of contributions received and the total amount of contributions made during the reporting period and the cumulative amount of those totals;

(B)

The current balance of committee funds;

(C)

The name and address of each person who made a contribution or contributions to the committee that exceeded five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate, the contributor's place of business, employer, or occupation, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and the total contributed for the year;

(D)

The name and address of each candidate or committee, if any, to whom or which the committee made a contribution or contributions that exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00) in the aggregate during the filing period, with the amount contributed and the election for which the contribution was made;

(E)

The name and address of each candidate or committee, if any, to whom or which the committee contributed a nonmonetary item, together with a description of the item, the date the item was contributed, and the value of the item;

(F)

The total amount of expenditures made for administrative expenses and for each single expenditure that exceeded one hundred dollars ($100), an itemization including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made; and

(G)

Any change in the information required by subsection (b) of this section.

(2)

The reports shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the committee stating that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the committee's contributions received and made.

(3)(A)

A report is timely filed if it is either hand delivered or mailed to the Secretary of State, properly addressed, postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating receipt by the post office or common carrier on the date that the report is due.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall accept via facsimile any report if the original is received by the Secretary of State within ten (10) days of the date of transmission.

(C)

The Secretary of State may receive reports in a readable electronic format acceptable to the Secretary of State and approved by the Arkansas Ethics Commission.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2006, § 3; 2007, No. 221, § 12; 2009, No. 473, § 8; 2019, No. 240, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted (c)(1)(E) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “reporting period” for “filing period” in (c)(1)(A).

7-6-227. Registration by independent expenditure committee.

(a)(1)(A)

An independent expenditure committee shall register with the Secretary of State within fifteen (15) days after accepting contributions that exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate during a calendar year.

(B)

Registration shall be annually renewed by January 15 unless the independent expenditure committee has ceased to exist.

(C)

Registration shall be on a form provided by the Secretary of State, and the contents of the form shall be verified by an affidavit of an officer of the independent expenditure committee.

(2)(A)

The independent expenditure committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing the name, address, and place of employment of each person that contributed to the independent expenditure committee, along with the amount contributed.

(B)

The independent expenditure committee shall maintain for a period of four (4) years records evidencing each independent expenditure made by the committee, along with the amount of each expenditure.

(3)(A)

The independent expenditure committee shall designate a resident agent who shall be an individual who resides in this state.

(B)

A contribution shall not be accepted from an independent expenditure committee and an expenditure shall not be made by an independent expenditure committee that has not registered and does not have a resident agent.

(4)

An out-of-state independent expenditure committee shall comply with the registration and reporting provisions of this section if the committee makes an independent expenditure or independent expenditures within the State of Arkansas that in the aggregate exceed more than five hundred dollars ($500) during a calendar year.

(b)

The registration form of an independent expenditure committee shall contain the following information:

(1)(A)

The name, address, and, when available, phone number of the independent expenditure committee and the name, address, phone number, and place of employment of each of its officers.

(B)

However, if the independent expenditure committee's name is an acronym, then both it and the words forming the acronym shall be disclosed;

(2)

The full name and street address, city, state, and zip code of each financial institution the independent expenditure committee uses for purposes of receiving contributions or making expenditures within this state;

(3)

A written acceptance of designation as a resident agent;

(4)

A certification by an independent expenditure committee officer, under penalty of false swearing, that the information provided on the registration is correct; and

(5)

A clause submitting the independent expenditure committee to the jurisdiction of the State of Arkansas for all purposes related to compliance with this subchapter.

(c)(1)

When a committee makes a change to any information required in subsection (b) of this section, an amendment shall be filed within ten (10) days to reflect the change.

(2)

A committee failing to file an amendment shall be subject to a late filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day the change is not filed.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 473, § 9; 2011, No. 721, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “independent expenditure committee” for “political action committee” in (a)(2)(A) and (a)(3)(A).

7-6-228. Campaign signs and materials.

(a)

A candidate may retain campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials that:

(1)

Were purchased by the campaign;

(2)

Were reported on the appropriate contribution and expenditure report for the campaign at the time of the purchase; and

(3)

Are retained for use in a future campaign by the same candidate.

(b)

A candidate:

(1)

May reuse the campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials under subsection (a) of this section in future campaigns; and

(2)

Is not required to list the campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials under subsection (a) of this section in future reports filed under this subchapter.

(c)(1)

Campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials under this section shall clearly contain the words “Paid for by” followed by the name of the candidate, committee, or person who paid for the campaign sign, campaign literature, or other printed campaign materials.

(2)

Subdivision (c)(1) of this section applies only to campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials created by or sponsored by a political candidate, the campaign of a political candidate, a political action committee, or an independent expenditure committee.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 10; 2017, No. 787, § 2; 2019, No. 1058, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 787, § 3, as amended by Acts 2019, No. 222, § 1, provided: “Applicability. A candidate running for election to any public office who possesses or creates a campaign sign, campaign literature, or other printed campaign material that does not comply with this act is exempt from compliance with this act if the campaign sign, campaign literature, or other printed campaign material was created before the effective date of this act”.

It is unclear when the exemption described in Acts 2019, No. 222 takes effect. The Uncodified Section 3 of Acts 2017, No. 787, which is being amended by Act 222, was in effect August 2017.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment added “a political action committee, or an independent expenditure committee” in (c)(2).

7-6-229. Amendment of reports — Affirmative defense.

(a)

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution or disciplinary action if a person required to file a report under this subchapter amends the report within thirty (30) days of discovering or learning of an unintentional error in the report.

(b)(1)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall not proceed with an investigation of an alleged error in a report filed under this subchapter if the commission determines that a person would be eligible to raise the affirmative defense under subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

If the commission does not proceed with an investigation of an alleged error in a report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the person shall not be considered to have committed a violation of the applicable statute.

(c)

This section shall not be construed to:

(1)

Remove the duty to file a report under this subchapter; or

(2)

Authorize a person to knowingly fail to file a report under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 10.

7-6-230. Alternative to electronic filing of reports.

(a)(1)

A candidate required to file carryover fund reports in electronic form under §7-6-203 and campaign contribution and expenditure reports in electronic form under §7-6-207 may file reports in paper form under this section if:

(A)

The candidate does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports in electronic form; and

(B)

Submitting reports in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the candidate.

(2)(A)

A candidate filing reports in paper form under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall submit with his or her first paper report in an election cycle a notarized affidavit on a form prepared by the Secretary of State declaring that:

(i)

The candidate does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports in electronic form;

(ii)

Submitting reports in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the candidate; and

(iii)

The candidate agrees to file all other reports in paper form for the duration of the election cycle.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall:

(i)

Not accept a report in paper form under subdivision (a)(1) of this section if a notarized affidavit was not submitted with the first paper report in the election cycle;

(ii)

Provide written notice to the candidate within five (5) business days if the report in paper form was not filed or accepted; and

(iii)

Provide the reason the report in paper form was not filed or accepted.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall make available to candidates wishing to file reports in paper form under this section:

(A)

Information on the deadlines for filing required reports; and

(B)(i)

Appropriate forms and instructions for complying with the deadlines.

(ii)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve the forms and instructions used by the Secretary of State to ensure that all required information is requested.

(2)

Reports shall be filed on the forms furnished by the Secretary of State, except that computer-generated contribution and expenditure reports shall be accepted by the Secretary of State and the commission provided that all of the requisite elements are included.

(c)(1)(A)

A report submitted in paper form under this section other than a preelection report is timely filed if it is either hand delivered or mailed to the Secretary of State, properly addressed, and postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on the date that the report is due.

(B)

A preelection report submitted in paper form under this section is timely filed if it is received by the Secretary of State no later than seven (7) days before the election for which it is filed.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall accept a report via facsimile, provided the original is received by the Secretary of State within ten (10) days of the date of facsimile transmission.

(d)(1)

The Secretary of State shall make available campaign contribution and expenditure reports submitted in paper form, carryover fund reports submitted in paper form, and affidavits accompanying reports filed in paper form, on a portion of the official website of the Secretary of State.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall comply with the requirements of §7-6-214(c) regarding the “paper filer” designation and publication requirements for all reports submitted in paper form.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 318, § 5; 2019, No. 1039, §§ 4[5], 5[6].

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted the (a)(2)(B)(i) designation, and added (a)(2)(B)(ii) and (a)(2)(B)(iii); and added the (d)(1) designation, and added (d)(2).

7-6-231. Alternative to electronic filing — Reporting of independent expenditures — Registration and reports for political action committees.

(a)(1)

A person required to file reports or register in electronic form under §7-6-215 or §7-6-220 may file reports or register in paper form under this section if:

(A)

The person does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports or registration in electronic form; and

(B)

Submitting reports or registration in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the person.

(2)(A)

A person filing reports or registration in paper form under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall submit with the first report or registration a notarized affidavit on a form prepared by the Secretary of State declaring that:

(i)

The person does not have access to the technology necessary to submit reports or registration in electronic form;

(ii)

Submitting reports or registration in electronic form would constitute a substantial hardship for the person; and

(iii)

The person agrees to file all other reports in paper form for the duration of the period of registration.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall:

(i)

Not accept a report or registration in paper form under subdivision (a)(1) of this section if a notarized affidavit was not submitted with the:

(a)

Registration of a political action committee; or

(b)

First report of a person or independent expenditure committee;

(ii)

Provide written notice to the political action committee within five (5) business days if the registration in paper form was not filed or accepted;

(iii)

Provide written notice to a political action committee, person, or independent expenditure committee within five (5) business days if a report in paper form was not filed or accepted; and

(iv)

Provide the reason the registration or report in paper form was not filed or accepted.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall make available to persons wishing to file reports in paper form under this section:

(A)

Information on the deadlines for filing required reports; and

(B)(i)

Appropriate forms and instructions for complying with the deadlines.

(ii)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve the forms and instructions used by the Secretary of State under this section to ensure that all required information is requested.

(2)

Reports shall be filed on the forms furnished by the Secretary of State, except that computer-generated contribution and expenditure reports shall be accepted by the Secretary of State and the commission provided that all of the requisite elements are included.

(c)(1)(A)

A report submitted in paper form under this section other than a preelection report is timely filed if it is either hand delivered or mailed to the Secretary of State, properly addressed, and postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on or before the date that the report is due.

(B)

A preelection report submitted in paper form under this section is timely filed if it is received by the Secretary of State no later than seven (7) days before the election for which it is filed.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall accept a report via facsimile, provided the original is received by the Secretary of State within ten (10) days of the date of the facsimile's transmission.

(d)(1)

The Secretary of State shall make available reports submitted in paper form on a portion of the official website of the Secretary of State.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall comply with the requirements of §7-6-214(c) regarding the “paper filer” designation and publication requirements for all reports submitted in paper form.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1039, § 6[7].